District of Columbia statutes.
50-2610

Rulemaking; Council review for 18 DCMR § 2407.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to make fee increases and to promulgate rules necessary to implement section 2407 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 2407), entitled Temporary and Emergency Parking Restrictions.

(b)

Any proposed fee increases, rules, or regulations shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council in a proposed resolution for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed resolution shall be deemed approved.

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 93, ch. 76, § 12
as added Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(h), 53 DCR 6499
This section is referenced in § 50-2533.